test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UNG_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲'usägúng - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UNG_STEM_2

     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägwáangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägwáangaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'usägwáangaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägwáangaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'usägwáang'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'usägwáang'ahlanggan
     k̲'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägwáang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'usägwáang'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'usägwáangaa'ahlang
     k̲'usägúng+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'usägwáangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'usägwáangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲'usägwáang'ahl
